Utah statutes.
78B-1-149.   Witnesses -- Officials subpoenaed not entitled to fee or per
diem -- Exception.
No officer of the United States, or the state, or of any county, incorporated
city or town within the state, may receive any witness fee or per diem when
testifying in a criminal proceeding unless the officer is required to testify
at a time other than during normal working hours.
